Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3049.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28-14-19 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-14 entitled "Payment of
Wages" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-14-19. Enforcement powers and duties of director of labor and training.
(a) It shall be the duty of the director to ensure compliance with the provisions of this
chapter and chapter 12 of this title. The director, or the director’s designee, may investigate any
violations thereof, institute or cause to be instituted actions for the collection of wages, and institute
action for penalties or other relief as provided for within and pursuant to those chapters. The
director, or the director’s authorized representatives, are empowered to hold hearings, and the
director or the director’s designee shall cooperate with any employee in the enforcement of a claim
against the employee’s employer in any case whenever, in the opinion of the director or the
director’s designee, the claim is just and valid.
(b) Upon receipt of a complaint or conducting an inspection under applicable law, the
director, or the director’s appropriate departmental designee, is authorized to investigate to
determine compliance with this chapter and chapter 12 of this title. The director or designee shall
forward all complaints to the investigatory team within the department of labor and training who
shall conduct the initial screening, investigation, and field audits, as set forth in § 28-14-19.1.
(c) With respect to all complaints deemed just and valid by the investigatory team, the
director, or the director’s designee, shall order a hearing thereon at a time and place to be specified,
and shall give notice thereof, together with a copy of the complaint or the purpose thereof, or a

statement of the facts disclosed upon investigation, which notice shall be served personally or by
mail on any person, business, corporation, or entity of any kind affected thereby. The hearing shall
be scheduled within thirty (30) days of in a reasonable and timely manner, not to exceed one
hundred twenty (120) days after service of a formal complaint as provided herein. The person,
business, corporation, or entity shall have an opportunity to be heard in respect to the matters
complained of at the time and place specified in the notice. The hearing shall be conducted by the
director or the director’s designee. The hearing officer in the hearing shall be deemed to be acting
in a judicial capacity, and shall have the right to issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and examine
witnesses. The enforcement of a subpoena issued under this section shall be regulated by Rhode
Island civil practice law and rules. The hearing shall be expeditiously conducted and upon such
hearing the hearing officer shall determine the issues raised thereon and shall make a determination
and enter an order within thirty (30) days of in a reasonable and timely manner, not to exceed one
hundred twenty (120) days after the close of the hearing, and forthwith serve a copy of the order,
with a notice of the filing thereof, upon the parties to the proceeding, personally or by mail. The
order shall dismiss the complaint or direct payment of any wages and/or benefits found to be due
and/or award such other appropriate relief or penalties authorized under this chapter and chapter 12
of this title, and the order may direct payment of reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to the
complaining party. Interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum shall be awarded in the
order from the date of the nonpayment to the date of payment.
(d) The order shall also require payment of a further sum as a civil penalty in an amount
up to two (2) times the total wages and/or benefits found to be due, exclusive of interest, which
shall be shared equally between the department and the aggrieved party. In determining the amount
of any penalty to impose, the director, or the director’s designee, shall consider the size of the
employer’s business, the good faith of the employer, the gravity of the violation, the previous
violations, and whether or not the violation was an innocent mistake or willful.
(e) The director may institute any action to recover unpaid wages or other compensation or
obtain relief as provided under this section with or without the consent of the employee or
employees affected.
(f) No agreement between the employee and employer to work for less than the applicable
wage and/or benefit rate or to otherwise work under conditions in violation of applicable law is a
defense to an action brought pursuant to this section.
(g) The director shall notify the contractors’ registration board of any order issued or any
determination hereunder that an employer has violated this chapter, chapter 12 of this title, or
chapter 13 of title 37. The director shall notify the tax administrator of any determination hereunder
LC005371 - Page 2 of 6

that may affect liability for an employer’s payment of wages and/or payroll taxes.
SECTION 2. Section 37-13-14.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 37-13 entitled "Labor and
Payment of Debts by Contractors" is hereby amended to read as follows:
37-13-14.1. Enforcement — Hearings.
(a) Before issuing an order or determination, the director of labor and training shall order
a hearing thereon at a time and place to be specified, and shall give notice thereof, together with a
copy of the complaint or the purpose thereof, or a statement of the facts disclosed upon
investigation, which notice shall be served personally or by mail on any person, firm, or corporation
affected thereby. The person, firm, or corporation shall have an opportunity to be heard in respect
to the matters complained of at the time and place specified in the notice, which time shall be not
less than five (5) days from the service of the notice personally or by mail. The hearing shall be
held within ten (10) days from the order of hearing. The hearing shall be conducted by the director
of labor and training or his or her designee. The hearing officer in the hearing shall be deemed to
be acting in a judicial capacity and shall have the right to issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and
examine witnesses. The enforcement of a subpoena issued under this section shall be regulated by
Rhode Island civil practice law and rules. The hearing shall be expeditiously conducted, and upon
such hearing, the hearing officer shall determine the issues raised thereon and shall make a
determination and enter an order within ten (10) days of after the close of the hearing, and forthwith
serve a copy of the order, with a notice of the filing thereof, upon the parties to the proceeding,
personally or by mail. The order shall dismiss the charges or direct payment of wages or
supplements found to be due, including interest at the rate of twelve percentum (12%) per annum
from the date of the underpayment to the date of payment, and may direct payment of reasonable
attorney’s fees and costs to the complaining party.
(b) In addition to directing payment of wages or supplements including interest found to
be due, the order shall also require payment of a further sum as a civil penalty in an amount up to
three times the total amount found to be due. Further, if the amount of salary owed to an employee
pursuant to this chapter but not paid to the employee in violation of thereof exceeds five thousand
dollars ($5,000), it shall constitute a misdemeanor and shall be referred to the office of the attorney
general. The misdemeanor shall be punishable for a period of not more than one year in prison
and/or fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). In assessing the amount of the penalty,
due consideration shall be given to the size of the employer’s business, the good faith of the
employer, the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations, and the failure to comply
with recordkeeping or other nonwage requirements. The surety of the person, firm, or corporation
found to be in violation of the provisions of this chapter shall be bound to pay any penalties assessed
LC005371 - Page 3 of 6

on such person, firm, or corporation. The penalty shall be paid to the department of labor and
training for deposit in the state treasury; provided, however, it is hereby provided that the general
treasurer shall establish a dedicated “prevailing wages enforcement fund” for the purpose of
depositing the penalties paid as provided herein. There is hereby appropriated to the annual budget
of the department of labor and training the amount of the fund collected annually under this section,
to be used at the direction of the director of labor and training for the sole purpose of enforcing
prevailing wage rates as provided in this chapter.
(c) For the purposes of this chapter, each day or part thereof of violation of any provision
of this chapter by a person, firm, or corporation, whether the violation is continuous or intermittent,
shall constitute a separate and succeeding violation.
(d) In addition to the above, any person, firm, or corporation found in violation of any of
the provisions of this chapter by the director of labor and training, an awarding authority, or the
hearing officer, shall be ineligible to bid on, or be awarded work by, an awarding authority or
perform any such work for a period of no less than eighteen (18) months and no more than thirty-
six (36) months from the date of the order entered by the hearing officer. Once a person, firm, or
corporation is found to be in violation of this chapter, all pending bids with any awarding authority
shall be revoked, and any bid awarded by an awarding authority prior to the commencement of the
work shall also be revoked.
(e) In addition to the above, any person, firm, or corporation found to have committed two
(2) or more willful violations in any period of eighteen (18) months of any of the provisions of this
chapter by the hearing officer, which violations are not arising from the same incident, shall be
ineligible to bid on, or be awarded work by, an awarding authority or perform any work for a period
of sixty (60) months from the date of the second violation.
(f) The order of the hearing officer shall remain in full force and effect unless stayed by
order of the superior court.
(g) The director of labor and training, awarding authority, or hearing officer shall notify
the bonding company of any person, firm, or corporation suspected of violating any section of this
chapter. The notice shall be mailed certified mail and shall enumerate the alleged violations being
investigated.
(h) In addition to the above, any person, firm, or corporation found to have willfully made
a false or fraudulent representation on certified payroll records shall be referred to the office of the
attorney general. A first violation of this section shall be considered a misdemeanor and shall be
punishable for a period of not more than one year in prison and/or fined one thousand dollars
($1,000). A second or subsequent violation of this section shall be considered a felony and shall be
LC005371 - Page 4 of 6

punishable for a period of not more than three (3) years imprisonment, a fine of three thousand
dollars ($3,000), or both. Further, any person, firm, or corporation found to have willfully made a
false or fraudulent representation on certified payroll records shall be required to pay a civil penalty
to the department of labor and training in an amount of no less than two thousand dollars ($2,000)
and not greater than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per representation.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005371
========
LC005371 - Page 5 of 6